Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.426

Articles of merger—Filing—Effective date.

(1) After each constituent organization has approved a merger, articles of merger must be executed on behalf of each constituent organization by an authorized representative.

(2) The articles of merger must include:

(a) The name and form of each constituent organization and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

(b) The name and form of the surviving organization and the jurisdiction of its governing statute;

(c) The date the merger is effective under the governing statute of the surviving organization;

(d) Any amendments provided for in the plan of merger for the organizational document that created the surviving organization;

(e) A statement as to each constituent organization that the merger was approved as required by the organization's governing statute;

(f) If the surviving organization is a foreign organization not registered to transact business in this state, the street and mailing address of the surviving organization's principal office for the purposes of service of process under RCW 23.95.450; and

(g) Any additional information required by the governing statute of any constituent organization.

(3) The surviving organization must deliver the articles of merger for filing in the office of the secretary of state.

(4) The effective time of a merger is:

(a) If the surviving organization is a limited liability company, upon the later of:

(i) Filing of the articles of merger in the office of the secretary of state; or

(ii) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, as specified in the articles of merger; or

(b) If the surviving organization is not a limited liability company, as provided by the governing statute of the surviving organization.

(5) If the articles of merger do not specify a delayed effective date, the articles of merger become effective upon filing as provided in RCW 23.95.210. The articles of merger may specify a delayed effective time and date in accordance with RCW 23.95.210.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7128; 2015 c 188 s 82.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.